District of Columbia statutes.
10-505.04

Transfer of member of Metropolitan Police to Capitol Police — Payments into Retirement and Disability Fund.

(a)

An amount equal to the total amount of: (1) deductions and withholdings from pay for retirement under the Policemen and Firemen’s Retirement and Disability Act (§ 5-701 et seq.) for police service treated as creditable service as a congressional employee under § 10-505.03; and (2) sums paid by the Congress to the District of Columbia as a retirement contribution for any such police service performed while detailed to the Capitol Police; shall be paid by the Mayor of the District of Columbia into the Treasury of the credit of the Civil Service Retirement and Disability Fund. For purposes of § 8334(c) of Title 5, United States Code, such payment shall constitute the required deposit for police service treated as creditable service as a congressional employee under § 10-505.03.

(b)

Payments into the Treasury required by subsection (a) of this section shall be made not later than the date on which police service is first treated as creditable service as a congressional employee under § 10-505.03 with respect to the individual or member involved.

Dec. 20, 1979, 93 Stat. 1099, Pub. L. 96-152, § 4
1981 Ed., § 9-119.